src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
bəčdxʷ+V:bəčd V_LABDXW "knock sm down" ;
labdxʷ+V:labd V_LABDXW "manage to see sm" ;
ləhaydxʷ+V:ləhayd TV_LABDXW "learn" ;
šudxʷ+V:šud V_LABDXW "see sm" ;
təɬildxʷ+V:təɬild V_LABDXW "believe sm" ;
tix̌ix̌dxʷ+V:tix̌ix̌d V_LABDXW "take care of it" ;
ʔəɬtxʷ+V:ʔəɬt TV_HUYTXW "feed sm" ;
ʔəƛ̕txʷ+V:ʔəƛ̕t TV_HUYTXW "cause to come|bring someone or something" ;
ʔux̌ʷtxʷ+V:ʔux̌ʷt TV_HUYTXW "take" ;
huytxʷ+V:huyt TV_HUYTXW "" ;
qʷalctxʷ+V:qʷalct TV_HUYTXW "boil" ;
x̌aƛ̕txʷ+V:x̌aƛ̕t TV_HUYTXW "like|want" ;
yəcəbtxʷ+V:yəcəbt TV_HUYTXW "tell" ;
yəhaw̓txʷ+V:yəhaw̓t V_HUYTXW "proceed" ;
šulud+V:šulud V_SELPED "crawl" ;
x̌ʷudx̌ʷud+V:x̌ʷudx̌ʷud V_KWEDAD_Dial/-SL "talk" ;
x̌ʷudx̌ʷud+V:x̌udx̌ud V_KWEDAD_Dial/-NL "talk" ;
huy+V:huy V_HUY "make|do|finish|be thus" ;
k̓ʷəšəd+V:k̓ʷəšəd TV_SELPED "count" ;
kʷədad+V:kʷədad V_KWEDAD "grab sm; pick up" ;
q̓ʷuʔəd+V:q̓ʷuʔəd TV_SELPED "gather sm" ;
ʔidigʷat+V:ʔidigʷat IV_BASE "teach" ;
ɬx̌ilč+V:ɬx̌ilč IV_BASE_Dial/-NL "stand up" ;
qʷibid+V:qʷibid V_KWEDAD "prepare" ;
ʔukʷukʷ+V:ʔukʷukʷ IV_BASE "play" ;
laʔbəd+V:laʔbəd TV_SELPED "look" ;
ʔiʔɬəd+V:ʔiʔɬəd TV_SELPED "eat a little|nibble" ;
t̕it̕əb+V:t̕it̕əb V_CUTEB "bathe" ;
x̌ayəb+V:x̌áyəb V_CUTEB "laugh" ;
qələb+V:qələb V_CUTEB "" ;
bəƛ̕əd+V:bəƛ̕əd TV_SELPED "touch" ;
k̓ʷit̕+V:k̓ʷit̕ V_KWEDAD "go down to the waters edge, but no further" ;
ʔatəbəd+V:ʔatəbəd AO_SELPED "die" ;
šəqšəqačib+V:šəqšəqačib V_CUTEB "raise hands" ;
ʔabačib+V:ʔabačib V_CUTEB "extend one hand" ;
ʔut̕šədəb+V:ʔut̕šədəb V_CUTEB "stretch ones leg" ;
laqusəb+V:laqusəb V_CUTEB "look behind ones self (by turning head)" ;
cutəb+V:cutəb V_CUTEB_Dial/-SL "" ;
cutəb+V:cutab V_CUTEB_Dial/-NL "" ;
saxʷəb+V:saxʷəb V_CUTEB_Dial/-SL "" ;
saxʷəb+V:saxʷab V_CUTEB_Dial/-NL "" ;
yuwiʔpačəb+V:yuwiʔpačəb V_CUTEB "tie ones hair back" ;
paq̓ad+V:paq̓ad V_KWEDAD "spread sm" ;
q̓ʷuʔgʷəsəd+V:q̓ʷuʔgʷəsəd TV_SELPED "mix sm" ;
k̓ʷəɬəd+V:k̓ʷəɬəd TV_SELPED "pour sm" ;
q̓ʷuʔəd+V:q̓ʷuʔəd TV_SELPED "gather sm" ;
bəčad+V:bəčad V_KWEDAD "put down" ;
kaw̓ɬəbid+V:kaw̓ɬəbid V_KWEDAD "try" ;
c̓ibid+V:c̓ibid V_KWEDAD "dip sm" ;
c̓agʷad+V:c̓agʷad V_KWEDAD "wash sm" ;
ʔəƛ̕+V:ʔəƛ̕ V_KWEDAD "come" ;
ʔəy̓dxʷ+V:ʔəy̓d TV_LABDXW "find" ;
haydxʷ+V:hayd TV_LABDXW "know" ;
tix̌ix̌dubut+V:tix̌ix̌dubut V_HUYTXW "take care of ones self" ;
səlpəd+V:səlpəd TV_SELPED "spin" ;
x̌ac̓iǰəd+V:x̌ac̓iǰəd TV_SELPED "cover" ;
t̕ilib+V:t̕ilib V_HELHED "sing" ;
təsadiʔ+v2+V:tsadiʔ V_HELHED "drum" ; ! check this vowel loss
q̓ʷuʔ+V:q̓ʷuʔ IV_HELHED "gather" ;
c̓agʷacut+V:c̓agʷacut V_KWEDAD "wash oneself (-t-sut)" ;
ɬič̓itəb+V:ɬič̓itəb V_PASS_TEB "cut (passive)" ;
ɬič̓txʷ+V:ɬič̓t V_HUYTXW "" ;
wiliq̓ʷitəb+V:wíliq̓ʷitəb V_PASS_TEB "ask (passive)" ;
t̕uk̓ʷtub+V:t̕uk̓ʷt V_BECHDUB "take home (passive? t̕uk̓ʷtxʷ)" ;
q̓ʷuʔtəb+V:q̓ʷuʔtəb V_PASS_TEB "get gathered" ;
q̓ʷuʔtxʷ+V:q̓ʷuʔt V_HUYTXW "" ;
bəq̓təb+V:bəq̓təb V_PASS_TEB "get swallowed" ;
xʷak̓ʷisəb+V:xʷak̓ʷisəb V_CUTEB "to tire sm" ;
kʷədayitəb+V:kʷəda»yitəb V_PASS_TEB "" ;
ʔabyitəb+V:ʔab»yitəb V_PASS_TEB "" ;
ʔux̌ʷtxʷyitəb+V:ʔux̌ʷtxʷ»yitəb V_PASS_TEB "" ;
ʔəy̓dxʷyitəb+V:ʔəy̓dxʷ»yitəb V_PASS_TEB "" ;
lək̓ʷyitəb+V:lək̓ʷ»yitəb V_PASS_TEB "" ;
ɬəgʷil+V:ɬəgʷil V_HELHED "leave" ;
tibicut+V:tibicut V_HELHED "try hard (physically)" ;
ɬaʔačiʔb+V:ɬaʔačiʔb V_HELHED "touch" ;
ʔusils+V:ʔusils V_KWEDAD "dive after something (ʔusils)" ;
ʔitut+V:ʔítut V_HELHED "sleep" ;
q̓ʷəlb+v2+V:q̓ʷələb V_CUTEB "roast something|cook" ;
gʷəč̓təb+V:gʷəč̓təb V_PASS_TEB "look for something (passive)" ;
ǰuʔil+V:ǰuʔil V_HELHED "enjoy oneself" ;
gʷədil+V:gʷədil V_HELHED "sit down" ;
ƛ̕iqagʷil+V:ƛ̕iqagʷil V_HELHED "come out of enclosure" ;
ɬəčil+v1+V:ɬəčil V_HELHED "arrive" ;
gʷəqilič+V:gʷəqilič AO_BASE "become enveloped in brightness" ;
ləx̌ilič+V:ləx̌ilič AO_BASE "become enveloped in light" ;
ʔibəš+V:ʔíbəš AO_BASE "walk" ;
ʔibibəš+V:ʔibibəš AO_BASE "walk around" ;
ʔa+v1+V:ʔa AO_BASE "be there" ;
ʔa+v2+V:ʔaʔ AO_BASE "be there" ;
ʔa+v3+V:ʔah AO_BASE "be there" ;
ʔux̌ʷyid+V:ʔux̌ʷ»yid V_KWEDYID_Dial/-SL ;!check for SL variant in š
ʔux̌ʷyid+V:ʔux̌ʷ»šid V_KWEDYID_Dial/-NL ;!does » causes problems
kʷədyid+V:kʷəd»yíd V_KWEDYID_Dial/-SL ;
kʷədyid+V:kʷəd»šíd V_KWEDYID_Dial/-NL ;
kʷədyid+V:kʷəda»yíd V_KWEDYID_Dial/-SL ;
kʷədyid+V:kʷəda»šíd V_KWEDYID_Dial/-NL ;
ʔux̌ʷtxʷyid+V:ʔux̌ʷtxʷ»yid V_KWEDYID_Dial/-SL ;
ʔux̌ʷtxʷyid+V:ʔux̌ʷtxʷ»šid V_KWEDYID_Dial/-NL ;
ʔabyid+v1+V:ʔab»yid V_KWEDYID_Dial/-SL "pass Dat" ;
ʔabyid+v2+V:ʔab»šid V_KWEDYID_Dial/-NL "pass Dat|give sm" ;
ʔəy̓dxʷyid+V:ʔəy̓dxʷ»yid V_KWEDYID_Dial/-SL ;
ʔəy̓dxʷyid+V:ʔəy̓dxʷ»šid V_KWEDYID_Dial/-NL ;
x̌ʷudx̌ʷudbid+V:x̌ʷudx̌ʷudbid V_KWEDAD_Dial/-SL ;
x̌ʷudx̌ʷudbid+V:x̌udx̌udbid V_KWEDAD_Dial/-NL ;
